Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 4. Benefits for Approved Job Training Program

§ 1471.
Training benefit program.

An individual who is otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter, but who has exhausted his or her maximum benefit amount under section 1340 of this chapter and any other available federally funded extension, is entitled to a maximum of an additional 26 weeks of benefits in the same amount as the weekly benefit amount established in the individual’s most recent benefit year if the individual is enrolled in and making satisfactory progress in either a State-approved training program or a job training program authorized under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

To be eligible for training benefits under this section, an individual shall be in compliance with both the following:

The individual has been separated from a declining occupation or has been involuntarily and indefinitely separated from employment as a result of a permanent reduction of operations at the individual’s place of employment.

The individual is enrolled in a program designed to train the individual for entry into a high demand occupation.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § E.401.1, eff. June 3, 2010; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 127.